District of Columbia statutes.
25-442

Hearings — Witnesses.

(a)

A party shall have the right to call and examine witnesses.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, at any proceeding before the Board in a contested case, the Board shall hear as witnesses all persons residing within and outside the neighborhood who desire to be heard.

(c)

The Board may exclude any irrelevant or unduly repetitious evidence or testimony.

(d)

A witness who shall willfully give false testimony in a proceeding or hearing before the Board shall be guilty of perjury.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-432.